Rhode Island statutes. Title 22 General Assembly
Chapter 5 The Grand Committee

22-5-1.
Composition — Agreement to assemble.

Whenever in the Constitution or laws of this state it is provided that any act or business shall be done by the grand committee, this grand committee shall consist of a majority of all the members of the senate and a majority of all the members of the house of representatives, duly assembled pursuant to an invitation from one of those bodies, which has been accepted by the other, and the acceptance of which has been communicated by message to the body in which the invitation originated, and each house shall be attended by its secretaries and clerks.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 20, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 26, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 25, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 302, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

22-5-1

.

22-5-2.
Roll call and quorum — Reading of invitation — Declaration of assembly.

When the senate and house of representatives are assembled pursuant to an invitation, the presiding officer shall order the roll of the senate to be called by the clerk of the senate, and if a majority of all the members of the senate answer to their names, the clerk shall order the roll of the house of representatives to be called by the reading clerk of the house, and if a majority of all the members of the house answer to their names, the presiding officer shall declare that there is a quorum of the senate present, a quorum of the house present, and therefore a quorum of the grand committee present; he or she shall then cause the invitation to meet in grand committee to be read, and shall declare the grand committee to be assembled and ready to transact the business specified in the invitation; and no business shall be proceeded with until all of the provisions of this section have been complied with.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 20, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 26, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 25, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 302, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

22-5-2

.

22-5-3.
Business limited by invitation — Subcommittee to count ballots.

No act or business of any kind shall be done in grand committee other than that which is distinctly specified in the invitation by virtue of which the grand committee is assembled, except to take a recess or to dissolve; provided, that the grand committee may appoint a subcommittee of its own members to count any ballots delivered to it and report the result of the count.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 20, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 26, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 25, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 302, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

22-5-3

.

22-5-4.
Record of proceedings.

The secretary of state, and in his or her absence the clerk of the senate, shall act as secretary of the grand committee, and shall keep a full record of the proceedings of it in a book to be provided and kept by the secretary of state for that purpose, which record shall in all cases include the names of the members of each house answering to their names at the roll calls provided for in §

22-5-2

, and at all other roll calls ordered by the grand committee. In the event of the failure of any of the secretaries or clerks named in this chapter to attend, as provided in this section, the grand committee may elect some person or persons pro tempore to perform their duties.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 20, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 26, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 25, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 302, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

22-5-4

.

22-5-5.
Roll call vote.

The ayes and noes of the grand committee shall be taken upon any question properly before the committee, at the request of one-fifth (1/5) of the members present; but this provision shall not be construed to require an aye and no vote upon the election of any candidate for office.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 20, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 26, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 25, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 302, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

22-5-5

.

22-5-6.
Quorum.

A quorum of the grand committee shall always consist of a majority of all the members of the senate together with a majority of all the members of the house; and whenever it shall appear that a quorum is not present, no act or business shall be done, and no motion shall be in order except a motion to take a recess or that the grand committee dissolve.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 20, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 26, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 25, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 302, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

22-5-6

.

22-5-7.
Provisions mandatory.

The provisions of this chapter are mandatory and not merely directory.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 20, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 26, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 25, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 302, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

22-5-7

.